test/src/morphology/N-uksh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ukš: # Noun 210 'eng /est uks/fin' - full paradigm
     ukš+N+Sg+Nom: ukš
     ukš+N+Sg+Gen: uks
     ukš+N+Sg+Par: ukstā
     ukš+N+Sg+Dat: uksõn
     ukš+N+Sg+Ins: uksõks
     ukš+N+Sg+Ill: uksõ
     ukš+N+Sg+Ela: uksõst
     ukš+N+Pl+Nom: ukst
     ukš+N+Pl+Gen: ukst
     ukš+N+Pl+Par: ukši
     ukš+N+Pl+Dat: ukstõn
     ukš+N+Pl+Ins: ukstkõks
     ukš+N+Pl+Ill: ukšīz
     ukš+N+Pl+Ela: ukšīst
